District of Columbia statutes.
13-441

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Interstate Depositions and Discovery Act”.

History

May 22, 2010, D.C. Law 18-147, § 2(b), 57 DCR 2552

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 1 of the Uniform Interstate Depositions and Discovery Act.